Hawaii statutes.
§324-43 Use of collected information.
(a) The information collected under this part shall be used by the department
of health or researchers only for the purpose of advancing medical and public
health research, medical education, or education of the public and health care
providers in the interest of reducing morbidity or mortality or increasing
physicians' knowledge of resources available for families of persons with birth
defects, and only as approved or exempted by an institutional review board.

(b) The identity of, or any information which
alone or in combination with other reasonably available information that may be
used to identify, any person whose condition or treatment has been studied
under this part shall be confidential.

(c) If the birth defects program or
researchers intend to collect additional information directly from a patient or
patient's relative for research studies approved by an institutional review
board, the researcher shall first obtain approval for the request from the
patient's primary care provider. If the patient's current physician is not
known, the patient may be contacted directly using a method approved by an
institutional review board. The use of the additional information obtained by
researchers shall be governed by subsection (a). [L 2002, c 252, pt of §2; am
L 2016, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next